Utah statutes.
75-5a-122.   Applicability.
This part applies to a transfer within the scope of Section 75-5a-103 made
after its effective date if:
(1)  the transfer purports to have been made under the Uniform Gifts to Minors
Act; or
(2)  the instrument by which the transfer purports to have been made uses in
substance the designation "as custodian under the Uniform Gifts to Minors Act"
or "as custodian under the Uniform Transfers to Minors Act" of any other
state, and the application of this part is necessary to validate the transfer.
